Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 4

Miscellaneous Provisions

59-4-401. Reports required of owners, superintendents or foremen.

It is the further duty of every owner, lessee of any coal lands, superintendent, or foreman to report the facts in the following cases promptly, to the department of labor and workforce development:

Any change in the name of any mine or any owner, agent, manager, superintendent, foreman (including, in the case of commercial coal mines, any change in assistant foreman or the officers of any company) which owns and operates a mine in this state;

Any working commenced for the purpose of opening a new shaft, slope, or mine;

Where any mine is abandoned or the working thereof is discontinued indefinitely;

Where the working of any mine is recommenced after any abandonment or discontinuance for a period of two (2) months;

Every lost-time accident in a mine other than a commercial coal mine, whether it results in death or not; and

Every accident of any nature to a person in a commercial coal mine, whether it results in death or not.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 24; 1917, ch. 111; Shan., § 3079a141; Code 1932, § 5624; Acts 1951, ch. 245, § 16 (Williams, § 5555); Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 16 (Williams, § 5638.16); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-415; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 36-38; 2016, ch. 599, § 7.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

59-4-402. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and chapter 12 of this title. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1992, ch. 574, § 9.

59-4-403. Mine safety training programs — Fee.

The department of labor and workforce development is authorized to organize and conduct mine safety training programs for the mining industry in Tennessee. The department is authorized to charge a fee sufficient to defray the costs of administering this chapter, but not to exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each training class consisting of up to ten (10) participants and fifteen dollars ($15.00) per additional participant.

Acts 2000, ch. 810, § 2.

Chapters 5 — 7

[Reserved]